Tennessee statutes. Title 32 Wills
Chapter 4

Contest

32-4-101. Certificate that will is contested — Contestant's bond.

If the validity of any last will or testament, written or nuncupative, is contested, then the court having probate jurisdiction over that last will or testament must enter an order sustaining or denying the contestant's right to contest the will. If the right to contest the will is sustained, then the court must:

Require the contestant to enter into bond, with surety, in the penal sum of five hundred dollars ($500), payable to the executor mentioned in the will, conditioned for the faithful prosecution of the suit, and in case of failure in the suit, to pay all costs that may accrue on the suit; and

Cause a certificate of the contest and the original will to be filed with the appropriate court for trial.

As used in this section, the term “the appropriate court for trial” means the court elected by the contestant, in the notice of contest, to conduct a trial upon the validity of the will.

Code 1858, § 2173 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 9; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 2); Shan., § 3905; Code 1932, § 8103; Acts 1980, ch. 765, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-401; Acts 2002, ch. 631, § 1.

Cross-References. Circuit court jurisdiction, §16-10-103.

Fees of clerks of courts administering probate matters, §§8-21-401,8-21-701,8-21-702.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, ch. 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 346, 350.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1405, 4-1502, 4-1503.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 9; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 51, 59, 62, 67, 68, 82.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Flowers v. Dyer County: The Death of the Motion to Dismiss for Lack of Subject Matter Jurisdiction, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 409 (1993).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1253 (1961).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

Estate, Gift and Trust Law-Joint and Mutual Wills-Proper Jurisdictional Vehicles for Contract-Based Mutual Wills Claims, 80 Tenn. L. Rev. 883 (2013).

“The Law of Joint Wills, A Recent Development” (William L. Harbison), 24 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-4-102. Bond of legatee or devisee.

If the legatees or devisees, or any of them, are adults, and have notice that the probate of the will is contested, the court shall require them to enter into bond, with surety, in the penal sum of five hundred dollars ($500), conditioned for the faithful prosecution of the suit, and, in case of failure in the suit, to pay all costs that may accrue on the suit, but an adult legatee or devisee who makes known in writing, to be entered of record, to the court that the adult legatee or devisee claims nothing under the will, and is willing that it be set aside, shall not be required to enter into bond.

If all the legatees or devisees are adults, and refuse or fail to enter into a bond, the will shall not be admitted to probate, but shall be held for naught, and the property of the supposed testator shall be distributed as the property of an intestate.

Code 1858, §§ 2174, 2175 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 77, § 1); Shan., §§ 3906, 3907; Code 1932, §§ 8104, 8105; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 32-402, 32-403.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 347, 348.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1502.

32-4-103. Contest in forma pauperis.

Persons may be permitted to have an issue made upon any will, either as plaintiffs or defendants, in the form prescribed for paupers.

Code 1858, § 2176 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 77, § 3); Shan., § 3908; Code 1932, § 8106; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-404.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 346, 347.

32-4-104. Issues — When and how made up — When triable.

After the filing of the certificate of the contest and the original will, in the office of the clerk of the appropriate court for trial, pursuant to §32-4-101(2), an issue or issues shall be made up, under the direction of the court, to try the validity of the will.

Code 1858, § 2177 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 9); Shan., § 3909; Acts 1925, ch. 8, § 1; Code 1932, § 8107; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-405; Acts 2002, ch. 631, § 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 366, 368.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 68.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

32-4-105. Proof of will.

Upon the trial of the issue in case of a written will with witnesses, it shall be proved by all the living witnesses, if to be found, and by such other persons as may be produced to support it.

Code 1858, § 2178 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 1); Shan., § 3910; Code 1932, § 8108; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-406.

Cross-References. Proof of will, §32-2-104.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 903 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 372.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 80.2; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 74.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 903; § 903.1.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Herman L. Trautman), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 882 (1962).

Wills, Trusts and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

32-4-106. Original will lost.

If the original will is lost or mislaid so that it cannot be produced on the trial of the issue, but the paper has been copied into the pleadings, or spread upon the minutes of the court, the court may proceed with the trial of the issue in the same manner as if the original were in existence and before it.

Code 1858, § 2179 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 77, § 2); Shan., § 3911; Code 1932, § 8109; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-407.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 371.

32-4-107. Trial by jury — Certification to probate court.

The issue may be tried by a jury, and their verdict, and the judgment of the court upon the validity of the will shall be certified to the court having probate jurisdiction over the will to be recorded together with the original will, if established.

If the issue was tried upon a copy of the original will, the copy shall be sent to the court to be recorded, and the certificate, copy, verdict, and judgment shall have the same effect as if the original paper writing were in existence and so certified to the court having probate jurisdiction over the will.

Code 1858, §§ 2180, 2181 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 9; 1851-1852, ch. 77, § 2); Shan., §§ 3912, 3913; Code 1932, §§ 8110, 8111; Acts 1980, ch. 765, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 32-408, 32-409; Acts 1992, ch. 951, § 9.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 367, 380, 382.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 66, 70.

Law Reviews.

Does Tennessee Need Another Tort? The Disappointed Heir (Jared S. Renfroe), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 129 (2010).

32-4-108. Statute of limitations.

All actions or proceedings to set aside the probate of any will, or petitions to certify a will for an issue of devisavit vel non, must be brought within two (2) years from entry of the order admitting the will to probate, or be forever barred, saving, however, to persons under the age of eighteen (18) years or adjudicated incompetent, at the time the cause of action accrues, the rights conferred by §28-1-106.

Acts 1927, ch. 3, § 1; Code 1932, § 8112; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-410; Acts 1985, ch. 228, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 322, § 15; 2011, ch. 47, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 325, 352.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 60.

Law Reviews.

Estate, Gift and Trust Law-Joint and Mutual Wills-Proper Jurisdictional Vehicles for Contract-Based Mutual Wills Claims, 80 Tenn. L. Rev. 883 (2013).

32-4-109. Trials upon validity of wills — Jurisdiction of courts.

Any court of record that has probate jurisdiction, whether a chancery court or other court of record established by private or public act, has concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit court to conduct a trial upon the validity of a will, in the manner and to the extent prescribed in this chapter. Notwithstanding law to the contrary, prior to certification of the fact of the contest pursuant to §32-4-101(a)(2), the contestant shall elect, in the notice of contest, either the circuit court or the chancery court, or other court of record having such concurrent jurisdiction, to conduct a trial upon the validity of the will.

Acts 1991, ch. 152, § 2; 2002, ch. 631, § 3.

Cross-References. Construction or interpretation of wills, concurrent jurisdiction of courts, §32-3-109.